Louisiana, session 2026, HB539.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:1484(B)(5) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.